Hawaii, session 2026, GM1266.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. Section 208, Hawaiian Homes Commission Act,
1920, as amended, is amended to read as follows:
"§208. Conditions of leases. Each lease made under the
authority granted to the department by section 207 of this Act,
and the tract in respect to which the lease is made, shall be
deemed subject to the following conditions, whether or not
stipulated in the lease:
(1) The original lessee shall be a native Hawaiian, not
less than eighteen years of age. In case two lessees
either original or in succession marry, they shall
choose the lease to be retained, and the remaining
lease shall be transferred, quitclaimed, or canceled
in accordance with the provisions of succeeding
sections [-r] j_
(2) The lessee shall pay a rental of $1 a year for the
tract and the lease shall be for a term of ninety-nine
years; [except] provided that the department may
2026-3355 HB2309 CDl HMSO

Page 2 2309
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
extend the term of any lease; provided further that
the approval of any extension shall be subject to the
condition that the aggregate of the initial ninety-
nine year term and any extension granted shall not be
for more than one hundred ninety-nine years[—]£
(3) The lessee may be required to occupy and commence to
use or cultivate the tract as the lessee’s home or
farm or occupy and commence to use the tract for
aquaculture purposes, as the case may be, within one
year after the commencement of the term of the
lease [—] j_
(4) The lessee thereafter, for at least such part of each
year as the department shall prescribe by rules, shall
occupy and use or cultivate the tract on the lessee's
own behalf [—]2.
(5) The lessee shall not in any manner transfer to, or
otherwise hold for the benefit of, any other person or
group of persons or organizations of any kind, except
a native Hawaiian or Hawaiians, and then, only upon the
approval of the department, or agree so to transfer,
or otherwise hold, the lessee's interest in the tract;
2026-3355 HB2309 CDl HMSO

iiiiiMniaiinHiiiiiinMi

Page 3 2309
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
[e*eept] provided that the lessee, with the approval
of the department', also may transfer the lessee's
interest in the tract to the following qualified
relatives of the lessee who are at least one-quarter
Hawaiian: [tes-fea^^dT—wife, ] spouse, child, [ee]
grandchild[—], or sibling's child. A lessee who is at
least one-quarter Hawaiian who has received an
interest in the tract through succession or transfer
may, with the approval of the department, transfer the
lessee's leasehold interest to a [brother or sister]
sibling who is at least one-quarter Hawaiian. Such
interest shall not, except in pursuance of such a
transfer to or holding for or agreement with a native
Hawaiian or Hawaiians or qualified relative who is at
least one-quarter Hawaiian approved of by the
department or for any indebtedness due the department
or for taxes or for any other indebtedness the payment
of which has been assured by the department, including
loans from other agencies where such loans have been
approved by the department, be subject to attachment,
levy, or sale upon court process. The lessee shall
2026-3355 HB2309 CDl HMSO
liiiiiBiiiiiiiiiniiiiiii

Page 4
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
not sublet the lessee's interest in the tract or
improvements thereon; provided that a lessee may be
permitted, with the approval of the department, to
rent to a native Hawaiian or Hawaiians, lodging either
within the lessee's existing home or in a separate
residential dwelling unit constructed on the
premises[—]£
(6) Notwithstanding the provisions of paragraph (5), the
lessee, with the consent and approval of the
commission, may mortgage or pledge the lessee's
interest in the tract or improvements thereon to a
recognized lending institution authorized to do
business as a lending institution in either the State
or elsewhere in the United States; provided that the
loan secured by a mortgage on the lessee's leasehold
interest is insured or guaranteed by the Federal
Housing Administration, Department of Veterans
Affairs, or any other federal agency and their
respective successors and assigns, which are
authorized to insure or guarantee such loans, or any
acceptable private mortgage insurance as approved by
2026-3355 HB2309 GDI HMSO
■HlimMIHMIIIlMWII

Page 5 2309
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D, 1
C.D. 1
I the commission. The mortgagee's interest in any such
mortgage shall be freely assignable. Such mortgages,
to be effective, must be consented to and approved by
the commission and recorded with the department.
Further, notwithstanding the authorized purposes
of loan limitations imposed under section 214 of this
Act and the authorized loan amount limitations imposed
under section 215 of this Act, loans made by lending
institutions as provided in this paragraph, insured or
guaranteed by the Federal Housing Administration,
Department of Veterans Affairs, or any other federal
agency and their respective successors and assigns, or
any acceptable private mortgage insurance, may be for
such purposes and in such amounts, not to exceed the
maximum insurable limits, together with such
assistance payments and other fees, as established
under section 421 of the Housing and Urban Rural
Recovery Act of 1983 which amended Title II of the
National Housing Act of 1934 by adding section 247,
and its implementing regulations, to permit the
Secretary of Housing and Urban Development to insure
2026-3355 HB2309 GDI HMSO
iniiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiwiiii

Page 6
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
loans secured by a mortgage executed by the homestead
lessee covering a homestead lease issued under section
207 (a) of this Act and upon which there is located a
one to four family single family residence[—]£
(7) The lessee shall pay all taxes assessed upon the tract
and improvements thereon. The department may pay such
taxes and have a lien therefor as provided by section
216 of this Act[—]; and
(8) The lessee shall perform such other conditions, not in
conflict with any provision of this Act, as the
department may stipulate in the lease; provided that
an original lessee shall be exempt from all taxes for
the first seven years after commencement of the term
of the lease."
SECTION 2. Section 209, Hawaiian Homes Commission Act,
1920, as amended, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read
as follows:
"(a) Upon the death of the lessee, the lessee's interest
in the tract or tracts and the improvements thereon, including
growing crops and aquacultural stock (either on the tract or in
any collective contract or program to which the lessee is a
2026-3355 HB2309 CDl HMSO

IIHNIBnililillilWIli

Page 7
H.B. NO.
T
h i
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
party by virtue of the lessee's interest in the tract or
tracts), shall vest in the relatives of the decedent as provided
in this paragraph. From the following relatives of the lessee
who are (1) at least one-quarter Hawaiian [7—husband,—wife, ]_£
S spouse, children, grandchildren, [b^?ethcrs,—or sisters, ]
siblings, or sibling's children, or (2) native Hawaiian[7—father
and mother,—widows—&r—wi-d©w€-rs-] : parents, surviving spouses of
the children, [widows—or—widowers—of-^the—dredhors—asd-sisderoT-
oe-eieoes-—aftd-e^opdewsTr] or surviving spouses of the siblings,--
the lessee shall designate the person or persons to whom the
lessee directs the lessee's interest in the tract or tracts to
vest upon the lessee's death. The Hawaiian blood requirements
shall not apply to the descendants of those who are not native
Hawaiians but who were entitled to the leased lands under
section 3 of the Act of May 16, 1934 (48 Stat. 777, 779), as
amended, or under section 3 of the Act of July 9, 1952 (66 Stat.
511, 513). In all cases that person or persons need not be
eighteen years of age. The designation shall be in writing, may
be specified at the time of execution of the lease with a right
in the lessee in similar manner to change the beneficiary at any
time and shall be filed with the department and approved by the
2026-3355 HB2309 CDl HMSO

Page 8
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
department in order to be effective to vest the interests in the
successor or successors so named.
In case of the death of any lessee, except as hereinabove
provided, who has failed to specify a successor or successors as
approved by the department, the department may select from only
the following qualified relatives of the decedent:
(1) [Husband or wife;] Spouse; or
(2) If there is no [h-u-sband or wife, ] spouse, then the
children; or
(3) If there is no [husband,—wife-?-] spouse or child, then
the grandchildren; or
(4) If there is no [dusteandT—wife-r] spouse, child, or
grandchild, then [brothers or siotcrs;] siblings; or
(5) If there is no spouse, child, grandchild, or sibling,
then sibling's children; or
[-(-§-)-] (6) If there is no [dasdandT—wife, ] spouse, child,
grandchild, [brother,—or sister,] sibling, or
sibling's child, then from the following relatives of
the lessee who are native Hawaiian: [father and
mother,—widewe—or-widowers] parents, surviving spouses
of the children, [widows or widowers-e-f—bhc brothers
2026-3355 HB2309 CDl HMSO


Page 9 H.B. NO.
T
h i
C.D. 1
end eiotorG^—or nicGoo and nephews.] or surviving
spouses of the siblings.
The rights to the use and occupancy of the tract or tracts may
be made effective as of the date of the death of the lessee.
In the case of the death of a lessee leaving no designated
successor or successors, [husband,—wife-r] spouse, children,
grandchildren, or relative qualified to be a lessee of Hawaiian
home lands, the land subject to the lease shall resume its
status as unleased Hawaiian home lands and the department is
authorized to lease the land to a native Hawaiian as provided in
this Act.
Upon the death of a lessee who has not designated a
successor and who leaves a spouse not qualified to succeed to
the lease or children not qualified to succeed to the lease, or
upon the death of a lessee leaving no relative qualified to be a
lessee of Hawaiian home lands, or the cancellation of a lease by
the department, or the surrender of a lease by the lessee, the
department shall appraise the value of all the improvements and
growing crops or improvements and aquacultural stock, as the
case may be, and shall pay to the nonqualified spouse or the
nonqualified children as the lessee shall have designated prior
2026-3355 HB2309 GDI HMSO 9
iiiiHiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiniiini

Page 10 2309
H.B. NO
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
to the lessee's death, or to the legal representative of the
deceased lessee, or to the previous lessee, as the case may be,
the value thereof, less any indebtedness to the department, or
for taxes, or for any other indebtedness the payment of which
has been assured by the department, owed by the deceased lessee
or the previous lessee. These payments shall be made out of the
Hawaiian home loan fund and shall be considered an advance
therefrom and shall be repaid by the successor or successors to
the tract involved. If available cash in the Hawaiian home loan
fund is insufficient to make these payments, payments may be
advanced from the Hawaiian home general loan fund and shall be
repaid by the successor or successors to the tract involved;
provided that any repayment for advances made from the Hawaiian
home general loan fund shall be at the interest rate established
by the department for loans made from the Hawaiian home general
loan fund. The successor or successors may be required by the
commission to obtain private financing in accordance with
section 208(6) to pay off the amount advanced from the Hawaiian
home loan fund or Hawaiian home general loan fund."
SECTION 3. Section 209, Hawaiian Homes Commission Act,
1920, as amended, as amended by section 2 of Act 80, Session
2026-3355 HB2309 CDl HMSO 10
HHIIIIIIIIIHniniHIIIIIMIHH

Page 11 2309
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
Laws of Hawaii 2017, and pending consent of the United States
Congress, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as
follows:
"(a) Upon the death of the lessee, the lessee's interest
in the tract or tracts and the improvements thereon, including
growing crops and aquacultural stock (either on the tract or in
any collective contract or program to which the lessee is a
party by virtue of the lessee's interest in the tract or
tracts), shall vest in the relatives of the decedent as provided
in this paragraph. From the following relatives of the lessee
who are (1) at least one thirty-second Hawaiian [—] j_ spouse,
children, grandchildren, [brothers,—or sisters, ] s ib]Jjig^j or
sibling's children, or (2) native Hawaiian[7—father and mobher,
wirdews—or -w-idewors] ; parents, surviving spouses of the
children, [widows or widowers of the brothers and sisters,—er^
nd-eee-s—and—nepheweT-] or surviving spouses of the siblings,-- the
lessee shall designate the person or persons to whom the lessee
directs the lessee's interest in the tract or tracts to vest
upon the lessee's death. The Hawaiian blood requirements shall
not apply to the descendants of those who are not native
Hawaiians but who were entitled to the leased lands under
2026-3355 HB2309 CDl HMSO


Page 12
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
section 3 of the Act of May 16, 1934 (48 Stat. 777, 779), as
amended, or under section 3 of the Act of July 9, 1952 (66 Stat.
511, 513). In all cases that person or persons need not be
eighteen years of age. The designation shall be in writing, may
be specified at the time of execution of the lease with a right
in the lessee in similar manner to change the beneficiary at any
time and shall be filed with the department and approved by the
department in order to be effective to vest the interests in the
successor or successors so named.
In case of the death of any lessee, except as hereinabove
provided, who has failed to specify a successor or successors as
approved by the department, the department may select from only
the following qualified relatives of the decedent:
(1) Spouse; or
(2) If there is no spouse, then the children; or
(3) If there is no spouse or child, then the
grandchildren; or
(4) If there is no spouse, child, or grandchild, then
[brothers or oistors;] siblings; or
(5) If there is no spouse, child, grandchild, or sibling,
then sibling's children; or
2026-3355 HB2309 CDl HMSO 12
liMHIIIilllliaiMIIIIINHIill

Page 13
H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
[ (5-)-] (6) If there is no spouse, child, grandchild,
[brother;—or siotor,] sibling, or sibling's child,
then from the following relatives of the lessee who
are native Hawaiian: [father and mother,—widows—or
widowers] parents, surviving spouses of the children,
[widows—O3s-widowe«—of—feho-^roihors—oftd—si-sior^-?—or
nioeos -and -nephews-. ] or surviving spouses of the
siblings.
The rights to the use and occupancy of the tract or tracts may
be made effective as of the date of the death of the lessee.
In the case of the death of a lessee leaving no designated
successor or successors, spouse, children, grandchildren, or
relative qualified to be a lessee of Hawaiian home lands, the
land subject to the lease shall resume its status as unleased
IS Hawaiian home lands and the department is authorized to lease
the land to a native Hawaiian as provided in this Act.
Upon the death of a lessee who has not designated a
successor and who leaves a spouse not qualified to succeed to
the lease or children not qualified to succeed to the lease, or
upon the death of a lessee leaving no relative qualified to be a
lessee of Hawaiian home lands, or the cancellation of a lease by
2026-3355 HB2309 CDl HMSO 13
liiiiiiiniuiiiliBiiii

Page 14 2309
H.B. NO.
H.D. 1
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
the department, or the surrender of a lease by the lessee, the
department shall appraise the value of all the improvements and
growing crops or improvements and aquacultural stock, as the
case may be, and shall pay to the nonqualified spouse or the
nonqualified children as the lessee shall have designated prior
to the lessee's death, or to the legal representative of the
deceased lessee, or to the previous lessee, as the case may be,
the value thereof, less any indebtedness to the department, or
for taxes, or for any other indebtedness the payment of which
has been assured by the department, owed by the deceased lessee
or the previous lessee. These payments shall be made out of the
Hawaiian home loan fund and shall be considered an advance
therefrom and shall be repaid by the successor or successors to
the tract involved. If available cash in the Hawaiian home loan
fund is insufficient to make these payments, payments may be
advanced from the Hawaiian home general loan fund and shall be
repaid by the successor or successors to the tract involved;
provided that any repayment for advances made from the Hawaiian
home general loan fund shall be at the interest rate established
by the department for loans made from the Hawaiian home general
loan fund. The successor or successors may be required by the
2026-3355 HB2309 GDI HMSO 14
HiiiniiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiiNiiiiii

Page 15
H.B. NO.
"'i
C.D. 1
commission to obtain private financing in accordance with
section 208(6) to pay off the amount advanced from the Hawaiian
home loan fund or Hawaiian home general loan fund."
SECTION 4. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect upon its approval
pursuant to section 16 of article III of the Constitution of the
State of Hawaii; provided that sections 1, 2, and 3 shall take
effect pursuant to title 43 Code of Federal Regulations part 48
on either:
(1) The date of the United States Secretary of the
Interior's notification letter to the Congressional
Committee Chairpersons that this Act meets none of the
criteria in title 43 Code of Federal Regulations
section 48.20; or
(2) The date on which approval by the United States
Congress becomes law.
2026-3355 HB2309 CDl HMSO 15
iliiliiiiiNiiiiiiiniiiiiiii

2309
H.B. NO.
I b
w o
Ob
APPROVED this 26th day of June ,2026
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 2309, HD 1, SD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of 2026.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 2309, H.D. 1, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: May 6, 2026
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2026.
Clerk of the Senate
68-26